Utah statutes.
59-13-301.   Tax basis -- Rate -- Exemptions -- Revenue deposited with
treasurer and credited to Transportation Fund -- Reduction of tax in limited
circumstances.
(1) (a)  Except as provided in Subsections (2), (3), (11), and (12) and
Section 59-13-304, a tax is imposed at the same rate imposed under Subsection
59-13-201(1)(a) on the:
(i)  removal of undyed diesel fuel from any refinery;
(ii)  removal of undyed diesel fuel from any terminal;
(iii)  entry into the state of any undyed diesel fuel for consumption, use,
sale, or warehousing;
(iv)  sale of undyed diesel fuel to any person who is not registered as a
supplier under this part unless the tax has been collected under this section;
(v)  any untaxed special fuel blended with undyed diesel fuel; or
(vi)  use of untaxed special fuel other than propane or electricity.
(b)  The tax imposed under this section shall only be imposed once upon any
special fuel.
(2) (a)  No special fuel tax is imposed or collected upon dyed diesel fuel
which:
(i)  is sold or used for any purpose other than to operate or propel a motor
vehicle upon the public highways of the state, but this exemption applies only
in those cases where the purchasers or the users of special fuel establish to
the satisfaction of the commission that the special fuel was used for purposes
other than to operate a motor vehicle upon the public highways of the state;
or
(ii)  is sold to this state or any of its political subdivisions.
(b)  No special fuel tax is imposed on undyed diesel fuel or clean fuel that:
(i)  is sold to the United States government or any of its instrumentalities
or to this state or any of its political subdivisions;
(ii)  is exported from this state if proof of actual exportation on forms
prescribed by the commission is made within 180 days after exportation;
(iii)  is used in a vehicle off-highway;
(iv)  is used to operate a power take-off unit of a vehicle;
(v)  is used for off-highway agricultural uses;
(vi)  is used in a separately fueled engine on a vehicle that does not propel
the vehicle upon the highways of the state; or
(vii)  is used in machinery and equipment not registered and not required to
be registered for highway use.
(3)  No tax is imposed or collected on special fuel if it is:
(a) (i)  purchased for business use in machinery and equipment not registered
and not required to be registered for highway use; and
(ii)  used pursuant to the conditions of a state implementation plan approved
under Title 19, Chapter 2, Air Conservation Act; or
(b)  propane or electricity.
(4)  Upon request of a buyer meeting the requirements under Subsection (3),
the Division of Air Quality shall issue an exemption certificate that may be
shown to a seller.
(5)  The special fuel tax shall be paid by the supplier.
(6) (a)  The special fuel tax shall be paid by every user who is required by
Sections 59-13-303 and 59-13-305 to obtain a special fuel user permit and file
special fuel tax reports.
(b)  The user shall receive a refundable credit for special fuel taxes paid on
purchases which are delivered into vehicles and for which special fuel tax
liability is reported.
(7) (a) Except as provided under Subsections (7)(b) and (c), all revenue
received by the commission from taxes and license fees under this part shall
be deposited daily with the state treasurer and credited to the Transportation
Fund.
(b)  An appropriation from the Transportation Fund shall be made to the
commission to cover expenses incurred in the administration and enforcement of
this part and the collection of the special fuel tax.
(c)  Five dollars of each special fuel user trip permit fee paid under Section
59-13-303 may be used by the commission as a dedicated credit to cover the
costs of electronic credentialing as provided in Section 41-1a-303.
(8)  The commission may either collect no tax on special fuel exported from
the state or, upon application, refund the tax paid.
(9) (a)  The United States government or any of its instrumentalities, this
state, or a political subdivision of this state that has purchased special
fuel from a supplier or from a retail dealer of special fuel and has paid the
tax on the special fuel as provided in this section is entitled to a refund of
the tax and may file with the commission for a quarterly refund in a manner
prescribed by the commission.
(b)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking
Act, the commission shall make rules governing the application and refund
provided for in Subsection (9)(a).
(10) (a)  The purchaser shall pay the tax on diesel fuel or clean fuel
purchased for uses under Subsections (2)(b)(i), (iii), (iv), (v), (vi), and
(vii) and apply for a refund for the tax paid as provided in Subsection (9)
and this Subsection (10).
(b)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking
Act, the commission shall make rules governing the application and refund for
off-highway and nonhighway uses provided under Subsections (2)(b)(iii), (iv),
(vi), and (vii).
(c)  A refund of tax paid under this part on diesel fuel used for nonhighway
agricultural uses shall be made in accordance with the tax return procedures
under Section 59-13-202.
(11) (a)  Beginning on April 1, 2001, a tax imposed under this section on
special fuel is reduced to the extent provided in Subsection (11)(b) if:
(i)  the Navajo Nation imposes a tax on the special fuel;
(ii)  the tax described in Subsection (11)(a)(i) is imposed without regard to
whether the person required to pay the tax is an enrolled member of the Navajo
Nation; and
(iii)  the commission and the Navajo Nation execute and maintain an agreement
as provided in this Subsection (11) for the administration of the reduction of
tax.
(b) (i)  If but for Subsection (11)(a) the special fuel is subject to a tax
imposed by this section:
(A)  the state shall be paid the difference described in Subsection
(11)(b)(ii) if that difference is greater than $0; and
(B)  a person may not require the state to provide a refund, a credit, or
similar tax relief if the difference described in Subsection (11)(b)(ii) is
less than or equal to $0.
(ii)  The difference described in Subsection (11)(b)(i) is equal to the
difference between:
(A)  the amount of tax imposed on the special fuel by this section; less
(B)  the tax imposed and collected by the Navajo Nation on the special fuel.
(c)  For purposes of Subsections (11)(a) and (b), the tax paid to the Navajo
Nation on the special fuel does not include any interest or penalties a
taxpayer may be required to pay to the Navajo Nation.
(d)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking
Act, the commission shall make rules governing the procedures for
administering the reduction of tax provided under this Subsection (11).
(e)  The agreement required under Subsection (11)(a):
(i)  may not:
(A)  authorize the state to impose a tax in addition to a tax imposed under
this chapter;
(B)  provide a reduction of taxes greater than or different from the reduction
described in this Subsection (11); or
(C)  affect the power of the state to establish rates of taxation;
(ii)  shall:
(A)  be in writing;
(B)  be signed by:
(I)  the chair of the commission or the chair's designee; and
(II)  a person designated by the Navajo Nation that may bind the Navajo
Nation;
(C)  be conditioned on obtaining any approval required by federal law;
(D)  state the effective date of the agreement; and
(E)  state any accommodation the Navajo Nation makes related to the
construction and maintenance of state highways and other infrastructure within
the Utah portion of the Navajo Nation; and
(iii)  may:
(A)  notwithstanding Section 59-1-403, authorize the commission to disclose to
the Navajo Nation information that is:
(I)  contained in a document filed with the commission; and
(II)  related to the tax imposed under this section;
(B)  provide for maintaining records by the commission or the Navajo Nation;
or
(C)  provide for inspections or audits of suppliers, distributors, carriers,
or retailers located or doing business within the Utah portion of the Navajo
Nation.
(f) (i)  If, on or after April 1, 2001, the Navajo Nation changes the tax rate
of a tax imposed on special fuel, any change in the amount of the reduction of
taxes under this Subsection (11) as a result of the change in the tax rate is
not effective until the first day of the calendar quarter after a 60-day
period beginning on the date the commission receives notice:
(A)  from the Navajo Nation; and
(B)  meeting the requirements of Subsection (11)(f)(ii).
(ii)  The notice described in Subsection (11)(f)(i) shall state:
(A)  that the Navajo Nation has changed or will change the tax rate of a tax
imposed on special fuel;
(B)  the effective date of the rate change of the tax described in Subsection
(11)(f)(ii)(A); and
(C)  the new rate of the tax described in Subsection (11)(f)(ii)(A).
(g)  If the agreement required by Subsection (11)(a) terminates, a reduction
of tax is not permitted under this Subsection (11) beginning on the first day
of the calendar quarter after a 30-day period beginning on the day the
agreement terminates.
(h)  If there is a conflict between this Subsection (11) and the agreement
required by Subsection (11)(a), this Subsection (11) governs.
(12)  Beginning on January 1, 2009, a tax imposed under this section on
compressed natural gas is imposed at a reduced rate of 8-1/2 cents per
gasoline gallon equivalent to be increased or decreased proportionately with
any increase or decrease in the rate in Subsection 59-13-201(1)(a).
